Georgia, session 2025_26, HB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as "Ethan's Law."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 9 of Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to child custody proceedings, is amended by revising paragraph
(7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 19-9-3, relating to the establishment and review of child
custody and visitation, as follows:
"(7) The judge is authorized to order a psychological custody evaluation of the family
or an independent medical evaluation.; provided, however, that the judge shall not order
- 1 -

LC 57 0272S
family reunification treatments or services. In addition to the privilege afforded a
witness, neither a court appointed custody evaluator nor a court appointed guardian ad
litem shall be subject to civil liability resulting from any act or failure to act in the
performance of his or her duties unless such act or failure to act was in bad faith."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 19-9-6, relating to definitions relative to child
custody proceedings, by adding a new paragraph, to read as follows:
"(3.1) 'Family reunification treatments or services' means any therapeutic intervention
which requires:
(A) Court ordered restrictions on contact between a child and a parent or legal
guardian;
(B) Overnight stays for a child in an out-of-state facility, hotel, motel, or camp;
(C) The use of private youth transporters or private transportation agents engaged in
the use of force, threat of force, physical obstruction, or coercion against a child; and
(D) The attendance of, or participation in, educational or experimental workshops."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -